apertium-sv-da/dev/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="salut__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>terne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="risi/ko__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciene</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koen</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koerne</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koer</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ko</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/atter__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atteren</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atter</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtrene</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtre</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="drage__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="eng/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lene</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- TODO: Hm?
    <pardef n="år__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    -->

    <pardef n="bid__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>det</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n/at__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ætterne</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ætter</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atten</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="anslag"><i>anslag</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barnerov"><i>barnerov</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="birkesfrø"><i>birkesfrø</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bovenbramsejl"><i>bovenbramsejl</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="byggryn"><i>byggryn</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diskettedrev"><i>diskettedrev</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dynevår"><i>dynevår</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="espeløv"><i>espeløv</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fingerpeg"><i>fingerpeg</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fodslag"><i>fodslag</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fredningsnævn"><i>fredningsnævn</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="genskær"><i>genskær</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="håndtag"><i>håndtag</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="husgeråd"><i>husgeråd</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kantebånd"><i>kantebånd</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krølhår"><i>krølhår</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="luftværn"><i>luftværn</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nachspiel"><i>nachspiel</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oplysningsforbund"><i>oplysningsforbund</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="postkort"><i>postkort</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="regionalsprog"><i>regionalsprog</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="røverkøb"><i>røverkøb</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samråd"><i>samråd</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sildeben"><i>sildeben</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skispor"><i>skispor</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skuffejern"><i>skuffejern</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snefog"><i>snefog</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="specieskøb"><i>specieskøb</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="statslån"><i>statslån</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="størstemål"><i>størstemål</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sværdslag"><i>sværdslag</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="team"><i>team</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tøndebånd"><i>tøndebånd</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="triumftog"><i>triumftog</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udstødningsrør"><i>udstødningsrør</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valdhorn"><i>valdhorn</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="engel"><i>engel</i><par n="eng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adgangskrav"><i>adgangskrav</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afvej"><i>afvej</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anvendelsesformål"><i>anvendelsesformål</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bænk"><i>bænk</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beskæftigelsesforhold"><i>beskæftigelsesforhold</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blund"><i>blund</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brag"><i>brag</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bydelsråd"><i>bydelsråd</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dampskib"><i>dampskib</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drabsforsøg"><i>drabsforsøg</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eg"><i>eg</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="erhverv"><i>erhverv</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="faldskærmsudspring"><i>faldskærmsudspring</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="finanslovsforlig"><i>finanslovsforlig</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flig"><i>flig</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forfatterhold"><i>forfatterhold</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forsvar"><i>forsvar</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gadekryds"><i>gadekryds</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grav"><i>grav</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hav"><i>hav</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvalp"><i>hvalp</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jægerkorps"><i>jægerkorps</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kidnapningsforsøg"><i>kidnapningsforsøg</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kongebrev"><i>kongebrev</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kursusformål"><i>kursusformål</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lejlighedsdigt"><i>lejlighedsdigt</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lys"><i>lys</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modsætningsforhold"><i>modsætningsforhold</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obligationssalg"><i>obligationssalg</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opløb"><i>opløb</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parketgulv"><i>parketgulv</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prust"><i>prust</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reservefond"><i>reservefond</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rykkerbrev"><i>rykkerbrev</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="selvmord"><i>selvmord</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skalmur"><i>skalmur</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skråtag"><i>skråtag</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slyng"><i>slyng</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sold"><i>sold</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sprøjtehus"><i>sprøjtehus</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stipendieudvalg"><i>stipendieudvalg</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="supplementbind"><i>supplementbind</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tankskib"><i>tankskib</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tilnavn"><i>tilnavn</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udkast"><i>udkast</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vejskilt"><i>vejskilt</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
